Maryland, session 2025, HB0099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–1602.
(a) In this section, “assessment district” means a tax assessment district:
(1) established by the county [through local law]; AND
(2) SHOWN ON THE OFFICIAL MAP ADOPTED BY THE COUNTY
COUNCIL TITLED “TAX ASSESSMENT DISTRICTS, 2005”.
(b) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE Board may
issue a Class A (off–sale), Class B (off–sale), or Class D (off–sale) license based on its
determination of whether the license is necessary to accommodate the public.
(c) [In making its determination,] IF THE APPLICATION IS FOR A CLASS A
(OFF–SALE) OR CLASS D (OFF–SALE) LICENSE, the Board [may consider whether the
establishment for which the license would be issued is in] MAY NOT ISSUE THE LICENSE
IF:
(1) THE ESTABLISHMENT FOR WHICH THE LICENSE WOULD BE ISSUED
IS LOCATED IN an assessment district in which the ratio of off–sale licenses per individual
[is more than] EXCEEDS one [per] FOR EVERY 4,000 3,750 3,500 individuals; or
(2) [an assessment district in which the ratio of off–sale licenses per
individual is less than one per 4,000 individuals] THE ISSUANCE OF THE LICENSE
WOULD CAUSE THE RATIO OF OFF–SALE LICENSES PER INDIVIDUAL IN AN
ASSESSMENT DISTRICT TO EXCEED ONE FOR EVERY 4,000 3,750 3,500 INDIVIDUALS.
(D) SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY:

HOUSE BILL 99 3
(1) TO THE TRANSFER OR RENEWAL OF A LICENSE THAT WAS ISSUED
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2025; OR
(2) IN THE 6TH TAX ASSESSMENT DISTRICT; OR
(3) TO AN APPLICATION FOR AN ON–SITE CONSUMPTION PERMIT
UNDER § 2–207 OF THIS ARTICLE BY AN APPLICANT THAT HOLDS A CLASS 5
BREWERY LICENSE.
(E) THE POPULATION OF EACH ASSESSMENT DISTRICT IS TO BE
DETERMINED BY:
(1) THE LATEST FEDERAL CENSUS; OR
(2) ESTIMATES PREPARED BY THE ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OFFICE
OF PLANNING AND ZONING.
(F) THE BOARD MAY NOT APPROVE THE TRANSFER OF A CLASS A
(OFF–SALE) LICENSE OR CLASS D (OFF–SALE) LICENSE:
(1) TO A LOCATION OUTSIDE THE ASSESSMENT DISTRICT IN WHICH
THE LICENSE WAS LOCATED ON JULY 1, 2025; OR
(2) IF THE LICENSE WAS NOT IN EXISTENCE AS OF JULY 1, 2025, TO A
LOCATION OUTSIDE THE ASSESSMENT DISTRICT IN WHICH THE LICENSE WAS
ORIGINALLY ISSUED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and 6 months and, at the end of
December 31, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall
be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.